src-fst-morphology-affixes-adjectives.lexc.md
Class 7 according to Feist 154-155
## i-stems
* LEXICON A-01_HOQPPI  hõʹppi:hõʹppi
* Yaml: **hoppi**
* There are several stem types
* hõʹppi:hõʹppi

* LEXICON A-01_KAAMMI  kaammi:kaamm
* Yaml: **piannai**
* There are several stem types
kaammi
käʹmme
kaammjen
käʹmmi

Class 8 according to Feist 155-157

Class 9 according to Feist 158

* Yaml: **A-saemmlazh**
ânnʼjõž:ânnʼj

* Yaml: **A-saemmlazh**
säʹmmlaž:säʹmmlaž

Diminutive derivations

(2009: 306)
* muõrâž:muõr
* Yaml: **N-muorazh**

* LEXICON A-02_MUORYZH-WITHOUT-PAL  paapp-
* :âž A-02_SG-NOM ;		 paappâž
* :že A-02_SG-ILL ;	 paappže
* :že A-02_ESS/PAR ;	 	 paappžen

* LEXICON A-02_MUORYZH-WITH-PAL    paaʹpp-
* :%>e A-02_SG-ABE/ACC/GEN ;	 paaʹppe
* :%>e A-02_SG-LOC ;	 paaʹppest
* :%>e A-02_SG-COM_IN ;	     paaʹppein
* +Use/NGminip+Use/NG: A-02_SG-COM_IN ;	     paaʹppin
* :%>e A-02_PL-NOM ;	 paaʹppe
* :%>e A-02_PL-OBL ;	     paaʹppei Merja differentiates from regular pl
* +Use/NGminip+Use/NG: A-02_PL-OBL ;	     paaʹppi

* Yaml: **N-muorazh**

* : HatY-STEM-PX-WEAKEN_LARGO ;  säʹmmlõõžž- Sg_Loc_PxSg1
* :%^PAL HatY-STEM-PX-WEAKEN_LARGO ;  säʹmmlõõʹžž- Sg_Loc_PxSg1

* LEXICON A-01_PEESSAZH  piissuž:pẹẹss

* LEXICON A_PIISSUZH  piissuž:piiss

(2009: 310)
* piissuž:piiss
* Yaml: **N-piissuzh**

* kuâlaž:kuâl
* Yaml: **N-kualazh**
kuâla, kuâlže
* : LOAOADDAZH-STEM-PX-ALLEGRO ;  This should go to each stem type ERROR

Class 11 according to Feist 162

Class 12 Feist 163

### Noun phrase heads
### Pl

### Number and case tags

Used with words like juurd: jurddǥatta

Sg_Nom: vow_di:vow_short:vow_low:pal_no:cns_gem
Is for nouns with *-ast* Loc
## 1. WORDS WITH SINGLE-SYLLABLE NOMINATIVE SINGULARS (2009: 180)
## 1.2 Sg.Loc in -ast (vowel shift)
Raised: Sg.Ill
Lowered: ELSE
a-stems (Sg.Loc, Ess, Par).
## 1.2.2 Sg.Ill vowel	-u
## 1.2.2.2 Lacks Palatalization
## 1.2.2.2.1 Lacks Specifically Pedagogical Gradation
## 1.2.2.2.1.1 Has Orthographic Gradation
## 1.2.2.2.1.1[] (Monophthong + Consonant Geminate alternation)
Strong grade: Sg.Nom, Ess, Par
Extra strong grade: Sg.Ill
Weak grade: Pl.Nom, Sg.Loc, Sg.Com
uâ:uõ, eä:iâ
## FORMS
N_A-URaise3-32
* Yaml: **N-vuarr**
grade: neutral (short_vowel, long_cluster), vowel: neutral (low)
Sg_Nom, Sg_Nom..., Sg_Abe_Px1, Sg_Acc_Px1, Sg_Gen_Px1, Pl_Nom_Px1

grade: weakened (long_vowel, short_cluster), vowel: neutral (low)
Sg_Abe, Sg_Acc, Sg_Gen, Pl_Nom, +Use/NG_Sg_Loc_Px..., 
stem_vowel: a : Sg_Loc, Sg_Com, Pl_Gen, Pl_Acc, Pl_Ill, Pl_Loc, Pl_Com, Pl_Abe

grade: strengthened (short_vowel, long_cluster), vowel: raised
Sg_Ill

grade: strengthened (short_vowel, long_cluster), vowel: neutral (low)
* : A-STEM-PX-STRENGTHEN ;            (5) vuârr
Ess_Px..., Sg_Ill..., N»A

grade: neutral (short_vowel, long_cluster), vowel: neutral (low), stem_vowel: a

grade: weakened (long_vowel, short_cluster), vowel: raised, stem_vowel: u/a
* +Der+Der/Dimin+A:%^CC2C%> A-01_PEESSAZH ;   (9) Dim.N.Sg.Nom: vuâraž

grade: allegro (short_vowel, short_cluster), vowel: neutral (low)

## Adjectives -- to be moved

* * *

<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [src/fst/morphology/affixes/adjectives.lexc](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-sms/blob/main/src/fst/morphology/affixes/adjectives.lexc)</small>
